Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 258 Animal Control and Protection
258.235.
Authority to kill or seize dog — Return by court to owner of vicious dog — Liability for damage — Proceeding by person attacked by dog — Disposition of dog after seizure — Powers of animal control officer — Vicious dog not to run at large.

Any person, without liability, may kill or seize any dog which is observed attacking any person.

Any livestock owner or his agent, without liability, may kill any dog trespassing on that owner’s property and observed in the act of pursuing or wounding his livestock.

Any dog determined to be vicious by a court and allowed to be returned to an owner shall be confined in a locked enclosure at least seven (7) feet high or a locked kennel run with a secured top. The dog may leave the enclosure only to visit the veterinarian or to be turned in to an animal shelter. The dog shall be muzzled if leaving the enclosure for either of these purposes.

Any owner whose dog is found to have caused damage to a person, livestock, or other property shall be responsible for that damage.

Any person who has been attacked by a dog, or anyone acting on behalf of that person, may make a complaint before the district court, charging the owner or keeper of the dog with harboring a vicious dog. A copy of the complaint shall be served upon the person so charged in the same manner and subject to the laws regulating the service of summons in civil actions directing him to appear for a hearing of the complaint at a time fixed in the complaint. If the person fails to appear at the time fixed, or if upon a hearing of the parties and their witnesses, the court finds the person so charged is the owner or keeper of the dog in question, and that the dog has viciously and without cause, attacked a human being when off the premises of the owner or keeper, the person shall be subject to the penalties set forth in KRS 258.990(3)(b), and the court shall further order the owner or keeper to keep the dog securely confined as provided by subsection (3) of this section, or the court may order the dog to be destroyed.

The animal control officer shall act as an officer of the court for the enforcement of any orders of the court in his jurisdiction pertaining to this subsection.

For his services in the proceedings, a peace officer shall be entitled to the same fees to which he is entitled for performing similar services in civil cases. In all proceedings under this section, the court shall place the costs upon either party as it may determine.

It shall be unlawful for the owner or keeper of any vicious dog, after receiving an order under subsection (5) of this section, to permit the dog to run at large, or to appear in public except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. Any vicious dog found running at large may be killed by any animal control officer or peace officer without liability for damages for the killing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 26; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 223, effective January 2, 1978; 1998, ch. 440, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 18, effective July 13, 2004.

258.240.
License for part of year. [Repealed.]

258.245.
Dogs with rabies vaccination and identification considered personal property — Destruction prohibited.

All dogs that have a valid rabies vaccination and bear identification are hereby declared to be personal property and subjects of larceny. Except as provided in KRS

258.235

, it shall be unlawful for any person except a peace officer or animal control officer to destroy, or attempt to destroy, any dog that bears identification.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 27, effective June 17, 1954; 1998, ch. 440, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 181, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 189, § 19, effective July 13, 2004.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, a county attorney would not be authorized to prosecute a person who shot and killed another person’s unlicensed dog.

OAG 72-99

.

258.250.
License not to be transferred from one dog to another. [Repealed.]

258.255.
Confinement and control of female dog when in heat.

Every female dog in heat shall be confined in a building or secure enclosure in such a manner that the female dog cannot come in contact with a male dog except for a planned breeding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 28, effective June 17, 1954; 2004, ch. 189, § 20, effective July 13, 2004.

258.260.
Issuance of license when dog removed to another county. [Repealed.]

258.265.
Care and control of dog — Destruction of dog running at large at night — Exemption for hunting dogs.

An owner shall exercise proper care and control of his dog to prevent the dog from violating any local government nuisance ordinance.

Any peace officer or animal control officer may seize or destroy any dog found running at large between the hours of sunset and sunrise and unaccompanied and not under the control of its owner or handler. A peace officer or animal control officer shall be under a duty to make a fair and reasonable effort to determine whether any dog found at large between sunset and sunrise is a hound or other hunting dog which has become lost temporarily from a pack or wandered from immediate control of its owner, or handler, and if he is reasonably sure that the dog is a hunting dog, then he shall not destroy the dog, unless it is found in the act of pursuing or wounding livestock, or wounding or killing poultry, or attacking human beings.

A hound or hunting dog may be unrestrained when engaged in lawful hunting activities while on private or public property designated or authorized for that purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 29, effective June 17, 1954; 1998, ch. 440, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 21, effective July 13, 2004.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A city ordinance providing that any dog running loose at night, whether licensed or not, may be destroyed should make destruction optional and conditioned on those factors contained in subsection (2) of this section.

OAG 73-105

.

258.270.
Kennel licenses; application; form; fees. [Repealed.]

258.275.
Liability for property loss or injury by dog or coyote — Procedures for enforcing claims for damages. [Repealed.]

258.280.
Kennel license tags; to be kept on dog. [Repealed.]

258.285.
Payments from livestock fund — Subrogation of claimant’s rights. [Repealed.]

258.290.
Dogs to be kept in kennel. [Repealed.]

258.295.
Payment by dog owner bars payment from livestock fund — Maximum sums for certain livestock and poultry — Appraisal value. [Repealed.]

258.300.
County tax commissioner to list dogs; fee; reports. [Repealed.]

258.305.
Compensation of dog owner where licensed dog is killed. [Repealed.]

258.310.
Sheriff to keep record of licenses and transfers of dogs. [Repealed.]

258.315.
Validity and payment of claims for loss or damage under prior law. [Repealed.]

258.320.
County livestock fund; sheriff to keep record of collections. [Repealed.]

258.325.
Confinement and destruction of dog found to have caused loss or damage to livestock, persons, or poultry — Harborer of unlicensed dog forfeits rights in livestock fund. [Repealed.]

258.330.
Sheriff to turn over six percent of license moneys to commissioner. [Repealed.]

258.335.
False statements and concealment of facts prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly to make any false statement or to conceal any fact required to be disclosed under any of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 36, effective June 17, 1954.

258.340.
County may aid when fund insufficient; surplus to be paid to school fund. [Repealed.]

258.345.
Quarantine of dogs in case of excessive damage to livestock, poultry, or domestic game birds — Destruction of dogs in violation of quarantine. [Repealed.]

258.350.
Sheriff’s fee for issuing licenses. [Repealed.]

258.355.
Nonliability of state for losses, injuries or destruction of livestock, poultry or dogs except claims arising after June 30, 1954. [Repealed.]

258.360.
Sheriff to make annual report to commissioner. [Repealed.]

258.365.
Other state and local laws not affected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or limit the right of any governing body to pass or enforce any ordinance with respect to the regulation of dogs or other animals, the provisions of which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to repeal any of the provisions of the fish and game laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky now in effect, nor any laws relating to the powers and duties of the secretary for health and family services, or any health officer relating to rabid animals or animals affected with any disease, or to prohibit the destroying of any animal in accordance with the provisions of any quarantine regulations, made in accordance with the provisions of any local or state health law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 39, effective June 17, 1954; 1998, ch. 426, § 521, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 22, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 574, effective June 20, 2005.

258.370.
Dog license collector — Appraisal of livestock injured by dog. [Repealed.]

258.380.
License collector’s term; removal. [Repealed.]

258.390.
Bond of license collector. [Repealed.]

258.400.
Compensation of license collector; disposition of license moneys. [Repealed.]

258.410.
Functions of dog licnese collector. [Repealed.]

258.420.
Liability of owner of dog injuring livestock; county to indemnify livestock owner; when. [Repealed.]

258.430.
Appraisal of livestock injured by dog. [Repealed.]

258.440.
Maximum amounts to be paid for livestock. [Repealed.]

258.450.
Judge to make certificate of appraisal; confirmation by fiscal court. [Repealed.]

258.460.
Fiscal court to deliver papers to claimant; claimant to deliver them to sheriff. [Repealed.]

258.470.
Sheriff to draw warrant for payment; certification by judge. [Repealed.]

258.480.
Claims to continue until paid in full. [Repealed.]

258.490.
Making of false statements prohibited. [Repealed.]

258.500.
Persons with assistance dogs not to be denied accommodations, transportation, or elevator service — Conditions — Exemption from licensing fees — Denial of emergency medical treatment for assistance dog prohibited.

As used in subsections (1) to (11) of this section, “person” means a “person with a disability” as defined by KRS

210.770

. “Person” also includes a trainer of an assistance dog.

If a person is accompanied by an assistance dog, neither the person nor the dog shall be denied admittance to any hotel, motel, restaurant, or eating establishment, nor shall the person be denied full and equal accommodations, facilities, and privileges of all public places of amusement, theater, or resort when accompanied by an assistance dog.

Any person accompanied by an assistance dog shall be entitled to full and equal accommodations on all public transportation, if the dog does not occupy a seat in any public conveyance, nor endanger the public safety.

No person shall be required to pay additional charges or fare for the transportation of any accompanying assistance dog.

No person accompanied by an assistance dog shall be denied admittance and use of any public building, nor denied the use of any elevator operated for public use.

Any person accompanied by an assistance dog may keep the dog in his immediate custody while a tenant in any apartment, or building used as a public lodging.

All trainers accompanied by an assistance dog shall have in their personal possession identification verifying that they are trainers of assistance dogs.

The provisions of this section shall not apply unless the person complies with the legal limitations applicable to nondisabled persons and unless all requirements of KRS

258.015

and

258.135

have been complied with.

Assistance dogs are exempt from all state and local licensing fees.

Licensing authorities shall accept that the dog for which the license is sought is an assistance dog if the person requesting the license is a person with a disability or the trainer of the dog.

Emergency medical treatment shall not be denied to an assistance dog assigned to a person regardless of the person’s ability to pay prior to treatment.

No person shall willfully or maliciously interfere with an assistance dog or the dog’s user.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 118, §§ 1 to 4; 1970, ch. 92, § 81; 1978, ch. 184, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 163, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 94, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 189, § 23, effective July 13, 2004; 2007, ch. 48, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

258.505.
Use of gunshot as euthanasia.

Gunshot shall not be used as a routine method of euthanasia in animal shelter settings. This prohibition shall not apply in animal shelter settings if an animal presents a threat to the health or safety of anyone lawfully on the premises of the shelter. The prohibition against gunshot shall also not apply to peace officers or animal control officers outside animal shelter situations if an animal:

Cannot be seized;

Presents a threat to the health or safety of the general public; or

Has an injury or physical condition which causes the animal to suffer.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 189, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.